North Carolina statutes. Chapter 54C. Savings Banks.
Article 8. Operations.

§ 54C-161.
Generally accepted accounting principles.

A savings bank shall maintain its books and records in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1.

§ 54C-162.
Liquidity.

A savings bank shall maintain cash and readily marketable investments in an amount that may be established in the rules of the Commissioner of Banks, but the requirement shall not be less than ten percent (10%) of the assets of the savings bank. Upon receipt of a duly certified copy of the resolution by the board of directors of any savings bank requesting a temporary suspension, the Commissioner of Banks may suspend the liquidity requirement for a period not longer than six months.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54C-163.
Net worth requirement.

A savings bank shall maintain net worth in an amount that may be established in the rules of the Commissioner of Banks, but the requirement shall not be less than five percent (5%) of the assets of the savings bank.
Upon receipt of a duly certified copy of a resolution by the board of directors of any savings bank requesting a temporary suspension, the Commissioner of Banks may suspend the net worth requirement for a period not longer than six months.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54C-164.
Deposit accounts.

A savings bank may raise capital through the solicitation of deposits from any person, natural or corporate, except as restricted or limited by law, or by any rules that the Commissioner of Banks may prescribe.

A savings bank may receive deposits of funds upon any terms as the contract of deposit shall provide subject to withdrawals or to be paid upon checks of the depositor.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54C-165.
Joint accounts.

Any two or more persons may open or hold a withdrawable account or accounts. The withdrawable account and any balance of the account is held by them as joint tenants, with or without right of survivorship, as the contract shall provide. The account may also be held under

G.S. 41-2.1

and have incidents set forth in that section, but if the account is held under

G.S. 41-2.1

, the contract shall set forth that fact as well. Unless the persons establishing the account have agreed with the savings bank that withdrawals require more than one signature, payment by the savings bank to, or on the order of, any persons holding an account authorized by this section is a total discharge of the savings bank’s obligation as to the amount so paid. Funds in a joint account established with the right of survivorship shall belong to the surviving joint tenant or tenants upon the death of a joint tenant, and the funds are subject only to the personal representative’s right of collection as set forth in G.S. 28A-15-10(a)(3), or as provided in G.S. 41-2.1 if the account is established under that section. Payment by the savings bank of funds in the joint account to a surviving joint tenant or tenants shall terminate the personal representative’s authority under G.S. 28A-15-10(a)(3) to collect against the savings bank for the funds so paid, but the personal representative’s authority to collect the funds from the surviving joint tenant or tenants is not terminated. A pledge of a joint account by any one or more of the joint tenants, unless otherwise specifically agreed between the savings bank and all joint tenants in writing, shall be a valid pledge and transfer of the account or of the amount so pledged, shall be binding upon all joint tenants, shall not operate to sever or terminate the joint ownership of all or any part of the account, and shall survive the death of any joint tenant.Persons establishing an account under this section shall sign a statement showing their election of the right of survivorship in the account, and containing language set forth in a conspicuous manner and substantially similar to the following:

Click to view

(a1)

This section is not deemed exclusive.
Deposit accounts not conforming to this section are governed by other applicable law as appropriate.

This section does not repeal or modify any law relating to estate taxes. This section regulates and protects the savings bank in its relationships with the joint owners of deposit accounts.

No addition to the account nor any withdrawal or payment shall affect the nature of the account as a joint account or affect the right of any tenant to terminate the account.

‘‘SAVINGS BANK (or name of institution) JOINT ACCOUNT WITH RIGHT OF SURVIVORSHIP

G.S. 54C-165

We understand that by establishing a joint account under that:

G.S. 54C-165

1. The savings bank (or name of institution) may pay the money in the account to, or on the order of, any person named in the account unless we have agreed with the savings bank that withdrawals require more than one signature; and 2. Upon the death of one joint owner the money remaining in the account will belong to the surviving joint owners and will not pass by inheritance to the heirs of the deceased joint owner or be controlled by the deceased joint owner’s will. We DO elect to create the right of survivorship in this account. ”

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1; 1998-69, s. 18; 2014-61, s. 3.

Cross References.

For present similar provisions relating to Payable on Death (POD) accounts, see

G.S. 54C-166.1

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2014-61, s. 3, effective July 7, 2014, in subsection (a), rewrote the present last sentence of the first paragraph, and made the former last sentence of the first paragraph the present second paragraph. See Editor’s note for applicability.

§ 54C-166.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-236, s. 3, effective October 1, 2011.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1; 1998-69, s. 19; 2001-267, s. 4; 2001-487, s. 61(b); 2012-168, s. 4; 2012-194, s. 63; repealed by 2011-236, s. 3, effective October 1, 2011.

Cross References.

For present similar provisions relating to Payable on Death (POD) accounts, see

G.S. 54C-166.1

.

§ 54C-166.1.
Payable on Death (POD) accounts.

If any natural person or natural persons establishing a deposit account shall execute a written agreement with the savings bank containing a statement that it is executed pursuant to the provisions of this section and providing for the account to be held in the name of the natural person or natural persons as owner or owners for one or more beneficiaries, the account and any balance thereof shall be held as a Payable on Death account. The account shall have the following incidents:

Any owner during the owner’s lifetime may change any designated beneficiary by a written direction to the savings bank.

If there are two or more owners of a Payable on Death account, the owners shall own the account as joint tenants with right of survivorship and, except as otherwise provided in this section, the account shall have the incidents set forth in

G.S. 54C-165

.

Any owner may withdraw funds by writing checks or otherwise, as set forth in the account contract, and receive payment in cash or check payable to the owner’s personal order.

If the beneficiary or beneficiaries are natural persons, there may be one or more beneficiaries and the following shall apply:

If only one beneficiary is living and of legal age at the death of the last surviving owner, the beneficiary shall be the owner of the account, and payment by the savings bank to such owner shall be a total discharge of the savings bank’s obligation as to the amount paid. If two or more beneficiaries are living at the death of the last surviving owner, they shall be owners of the account as joint tenants with right of survivorship as provided in

G.S. 54C-165

, and payment by the savings bank to the owners or any of the owners shall be a total discharge of the savings bank’s obligation as to the amount paid.

If only one beneficiary is living and that beneficiary is not of legal age at the death of the last surviving owner, the savings bank shall transfer the funds in the account to the general guardian or guardian of the estate, if any, of the minor beneficiary. If no guardian of the minor beneficiary has been appointed, the savings bank shall hold the funds in a similar interest bearing account in the name of the minor until the minor reaches the age of majority or until a duly appointed guardian withdraws the funds.

If the beneficiary is an entity other than a natural person, there shall be only one beneficiary.

If one or more owners survive the last surviving beneficiary who was a natural person, or if a beneficiary who is an entity other than a natural person should cease to exist before the death of the owner, the account shall become an individual account of the owner, or a joint account with right of survivorship of the owners, and shall have the legal incidents of an individual account in a case of a single owner or a joint account with right of survivorship, as provided in G.S. 54C-165, in the case of multiple owners.

Prior to the death of the last surviving owner, no beneficiary shall have any ownership interest in a Payable on Death account. Funds in a Payable on Death account established pursuant to this subsection shall belong to the beneficiary or beneficiaries upon the death of the last surviving owner, and the funds shall be subject only to the personal representative’s right of collection as set forth in G.S. 28A-15-10(a)(1). Payment by the savings bank of funds in the Payable on Death account to the beneficiary or beneficiaries shall terminate the personal representative’s authority under G.S. 28A-15-10(a)(1) to collect against the savings bank for the funds so paid, but the personal representative’s authority to collect such funds from the beneficiary or beneficiaries is not terminated.The natural person or natural persons establishing an account under this subsection shall sign a statement containing language set forth in a conspicuous manner and substantially similar to the language set out below; the language may be on a signature card or in an explanation of the account that is set out in a separate document whose receipt is acknowledged by the person or persons establishing the account:

Click to view

This section shall not be deemed exclusive. Deposit accounts not conforming to this section shall be governed by other applicable provisions of the General Statutes or the common law, as appropriate.

No addition to such accounts, nor any withdrawal, payment, or change of beneficiary, shall affect the nature of such accounts as Payable on Death accounts or affect the right of any owner to terminate the account.

This section does not repeal or modify any provisions of laws relating to estate taxes.

‘‘SAVINGS BANK (or name of institution) PAYABLE ON DEATH ACCOUNT

G.S. 54C-166.1

I (or we) understand that by establishing a Payable on Death account under the provisions of that: North Carolina General Statute 54C-166.1 1. During my (or our) lifetime I (or we), individually or jointly, may withdraw the money in the account. 2. By written direction to the savings bank (or name of institution) I (or we), individually or jointly, may change the beneficiary or beneficiaries. 3. Upon my (or our) death the money remaining in the account will belong to the beneficiary or beneficiaries, and the money will not be inherited by my (or our) heirs or be controlled by will. ”

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1; 1998-69, s. 19; 2001-267, s. 4; 2001-487, s. 61(b); 2011-236, s. 3; 2012-168, s. 4; 2012-194, s. 63.

§ 54C-167.
Personal agency accounts.

A person may open a personal agency account by written contract containing a statement that it is executed under this section. A personal agency account may be a checking account, savings account, time deposit, or any other type of withdrawable account or certificate. The written contract shall name an agent who shall have authority to act on behalf of the depositor in regard to the account as set out in this subsection. The agent shall have the authority to:

Make, sign, or execute checks drawn on the account or otherwise make withdrawals from the account;

Endorse checks made payable to the principal for deposit only into the account; and

Deposit cash or negotiable instruments, including instruments endorsed by the principal, into the account.A person establishing an account under this section shall sign a statement containing language substantially similar to the following in a conspicuous manner:

Click to view

An account created under this section grants no ownership right or interest in the agent. Upon the death of the principal there is no right of survivorship to the account and the authority set out in subsection (a) of this section terminates.

The written contract referred to in subsection (a) of this section shall provide that the principal may elect to extend the authority of the agent to act on behalf of the principal in regard to the account notwithstanding the subsequent incapacity or mental incompetence of the principal. If the principal so elects to extend the authority of the agent, then upon the subsequent incapacity or mental incompetence of the principal, the agent may continue to exercise the authority, without the requirement of bond or of accounting to any court, until the agent receives actual knowledge that the authority has been terminated by a duly qualified guardian of the estate of the incapacitated or incompetent principal, or by the duly appointed attorney-in-fact for the incapacitated or incompetent principal, acting under a durable power of attorney, as defined in

G.S. 32A-8

[see now

G.S. 32C-1-102

], which grants to the attorney-in-fact that authority in regard to the account which is granted to the agent by the written contract executed under this section, at which time the agent shall account to the guardian or attorney-in-fact for all actions of the agent in regard to the account during the incapacity or incompetence of the principal. If the principal does not so elect to extend the authority of the agent, then upon the subsequent incapacity or mental incompetence of the principal, the authority of the agent terminates.

When an account under this section has been established, all or part of the account or any interest or dividend thereon may be paid by the savings bank on a check made, signed, or executed by the agent. In the absence of actual knowledge that the principal has died or that the agency created by the account has been terminated, the payment is a valid and sufficient discharge to the savings bank for payment so made.

‘‘SAVINGS BANK (or name of institution) PERSONAL AGENCY ACCOUNT

G.S. 54C-167

I understand that, by establishing a personal agency account under , the agent named in the account may:

G.S. 54C-167

1. Sign checks drawn on the account; and 2. Make deposits into the account. I also understand that upon my death the money remaining in the account will be controlled by my will or inherited by my heirs. ”

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1.

§ 54C-168.
Collection of processing fee for returned checks.

Notwithstanding any other law, a savings bank may charge and collect a processing fee for checks on which payment has been refused by the payor depository institution.
A savings bank may also collect a processing fee for checks drawn on that savings bank with respect to an account with insufficient funds.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1.

§ 54C-169.
Right of setoff on deposit accounts.

A savings bank shall have a right of setoff, without further agreement or pledge, upon all deposit accounts owned by any member or customer to whom or upon whose behalf the savings bank has made as unsecured advance of money by loan. Upon default in the repayment or satisfaction thereof, the savings bank may cancel on its books all or any part of the deposit accounts owned by the member or customer, and apply the value of the accounts in payment of the obligation.

A savings bank that exercises the right of setoff provided in this section shall first give 30 days’ notice to the member or customer that the right will be exercised. The accounts may be held or frozen, with no withdrawals permitted, during the 30-day notice period. The accounts may not be canceled and the value of the accounts may not be applied to pay the obligation until the 30-day period has expired without the member or customer having cured the default on the obligation. The amount of any member’s or customer’s interest in a joint account or other account held in the names of more than one person is subject to the right of setoff provided in this section.

This section is not exclusive, but shall be in addition to contract, common law, and other rights of setoff. Any other rights are not governed in any fashion by this section.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1.

§ 54C-170.
Minors as deposit account holders.

A savings bank may issue a deposit account to a minor as the sole and absolute owner, or as a joint owner, and receive payments, pay withdrawals, accept pledges and act in any other manner with respect to the account on the order of the minor with like effect as if the minor were of full age and legal capacity. Any payment to a minor is a discharge of the savings bank to the extent thereof. The account shall be held for the exclusive right and benefit of the minor, and any joint owners, free from the control of all persons, except creditors.

A savings bank may lease a safe deposit box to a minor and, with respect to the lease, may deal with the minor in all regards as if the minor were of full age and legal capacity. A minor entering a lease agreement with a savings bank under this subsection is bound by the terms of the agreement to the same extent as if the minor were of full age and legal capacity.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 829, s. 11.

§ 54C-171.
Deposit accounts as deposit of securities.

Notwithstanding any restrictions or limitations contained in any law of this State, the deposit accounts of any State savings bank may be accepted by any agency, department, or official of this State in any case wherein the agency, department, or official acting in its official capacity requires that securities be deposited with the agency, department, or official.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1.

§ 54C-172.
New account books.

A new account book or certificate or other evidence of ownership of a deposit account may be issued in the name of the holder of record at any time, when requested by the holder or the holder’s legal representative, upon proof satisfactory to the savings bank that the original account book or certificate has been lost or destroyed.
The new account book or certificate shall expressly state that it is issued in lieu of the one lost or destroyed and that the savings bank shall in no way be liable thereafter on account of the original book or certificate.
The savings bank may, in its bylaws, require indemnification against any loss that might result from the issuance of the new account book or certified certificate.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1.

§ 54C-173.
Transfer of deposit accounts.

The owner of a deposit account may transfer the owner’s rights therein absolutely or conditionally to any other person eligible to hold the same, but the transfer may be made on the books of the savings bank only upon presentation of evidence of transfer satisfactory to the savings bank, and accompanied by the proper application for transfer by the transferor and transferee, who shall accept the account subject to the terms and conditions of the account contract, the bylaws of the savings bank, the certificate of incorporation of the savings bank, and all rules of the Commissioner of Banks. Notwithstanding the effectiveness of a transfer between the parties, the savings bank may treat the holder of record of a deposit account as the owner of the deposit account for all purposes, including payment and voting, in the case of a mutual savings bank, until the savings bank records the transfer and assignment.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54C-174.
Authority of power of attorney.

A savings bank may continue to recognize the authority of an individual holding a power of attorney in writing to manage or to make withdrawals, either in whole or in part, from the deposit account of a customer or member until the savings bank receives written or actual notice of death or of adjudication of incompetency of the member or revocation of the authority of the individual holding the power of attorney.
Payment by the savings bank to an individual holding a power of attorney before receipt of the notice is a total discharge of the savings bank’s obligation as to the amount so paid.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1.

§ 54C-175.
Days and hours of operation.

A savings bank may operate on such days and during such hours, and may observe such holidays, as the savings bank’s board of directors shall designate.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 556, s. 4.

§ 54C-176.
Power to borrow money.

A savings bank, in its certificate of incorporation or in its bylaws, may authorize the board of directors to borrow money, and the board of directors may, by resolution adopted by a vote of at least two-thirds of the entire board duly recorded in the minutes, authorize the officers of the savings bank to borrow money for the savings bank on any terms and conditions as the board may deem proper.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1.

§ 54C-177.
Authority to join federal reserve bank.

A State savings bank may subscribe to the capital stock and become a member of a federal reserve bank.
A savings bank shall continue to be subject to the supervision and examination required by the laws of this State, except that the Federal Reserve Board shall have the right, if it deems necessary, to make examinations; and the Commissioner of Banks may disclose to the Federal Reserve Board, or to the examiners duly appointed by it, all information in reference to the affairs of a savings bank that has become, or desires to become, a member of a federal reserve bank.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54C-178.
Regional reciprocal acquisitions.

State savings banks and holding companies thereof shall have the same powers to acquire and be acquired as State associations and their savings and loan holding companies under Article 3A of Chapter 54B of the General Statutes. For this purpose, the term “association” as used in Article 3A of Chapter 54B of the General Statutes shall include a State savings bank chartered under this Chapter, and the term “savings and loan holding company” shall include holding companies of State savings banks chartered under this Chapter.

History.

1991, c. 680, s. 1.

§ 54C-179.
Forced retirement of deposit accounts.

A savings bank may, at any time that funds are on hand and available for this purpose, force the retirement of and redeem all or any portion of its deposit accounts that have not been pledged as security for loans. A savings bank may not redeem any fixed term deposit accounts that have not matured. The board of directors of the savings bank shall determine the number of and total amount of the deposit accounts to be retired.

A savings bank shall give at least 30 days’ notice by certified mail to the last address of each holder of an affected deposit account. The redemption price of deposit accounts so retired is the full withdrawal value of the account, as determined on the last interest date, plus all interest on deposit accounts credited or paid as of the effective retirement date. Interest continues to accrue and be paid or credited by the savings bank to the deposit accounts to be retired through the effective retirement date.

Interest on the deposit accounts called for forced retirement ceases to accrue after the effective retirement date, if the required notice has been given properly, and if on the retirement date the funds necessary for payment have been set aside so as to be available. All rights with respect to those deposit accounts terminate after the effective retirement date, except for the right of the holder of the retired deposit account to receive the full redemption price.

A savings bank shall not redeem deposit accounts by forced retirement whenever it has on file applications for withdrawal or maturities that have not yet been acted upon and paid.

History.

1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 829, s. 12.

§ 54C-180.
Savings promotion raffles.

A savings bank may offer a savings promotion raffle in which the sole consideration required for a chance of winning designated prizes is the deposit of a minimum specified amount of money in a savings account or other savings program offered by the savings bank. A savings bank shall maintain records sufficient to facilitate an audit of the savings promotion raffle, shall conduct the savings promotion raffle in a safe and sound manner, and shall fully disclose the terms and conditions of the promotion to account holders and prospective account holders of the savings bank.

History.

2019-173, s. 2(d).

§§ 54C-181 through 54C-194.

Reserved for future codification purposes.